New York, session 2025-2026, S3784.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 305 of the education law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 63 to read as follows: 3 63. Notwithstanding any rule of the regents to the contrary, the 4 commissioner shall promulgate rules providing academic credit, which 5 shall be utilized in the awarding of all types of high school diplomas, 6 for practical experience received by students while in high school. 7 Subject to the rules of the commissioner, practical experience may be 8 deemed to satisfy requirements for successful completion of an academic 9 course of instruction, related to such experience, which is necessary 10 for the awarding of a high school diploma. Practical experience shall 11 include internships and other learning experiences which occur outside 12 of school, and which provide experience and knowledge in an academic 13 discipline or a trade. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of September next 15 succeeding the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04989-01-5